District of Columbia statutes.
31-2903

Applicability.

The requirements of this subchapter shall apply:

(1)

To any health benefit plan delivered or issued for delivery in the District more than 120 days after March 7, 1991; and

(2)

To any health benefit plan renewed, amended, or reissued 120 days after March 7, 1991.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-225, § 4, 38 DCR 217
June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 401(c), 50 DCR 306
1981 Ed., § 35-2403.
D.C. Law 14-312, in pars. (1) and (2), substituted “health benefit plan” for “insurance policy or subscriber contract”.